Utah statutes.
13-8-5.   Definitions -- Limitation on retention proceeds withheld --
Deposit in interest-bearing escrow account -- Release of proceeds -- Payment
to subcontractors -- Penalty -- No waiver.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a) (i)  "Construction contract" means a written agreement between the parties
relative to the design, construction, alteration, repair, or maintenance of a
building, structure, highway, appurtenance, appliance, or other improvements
to real property, including moving, demolition, and excavating for
nonresidential commercial or industrial construction projects.
(ii)  If the construction contract is for construction of a project that is
part residential and part nonresidential, this section applies only to that
portion of the construction project that is nonresidential as determined pro
rata based on the percentage of the total square footage of the project that
is nonresidential.
(b)  "Construction lender" means any person, including a bank, trust company,
savings bank, industrial bank, land bank, safe deposit company, private
banker, savings and loan association, credit union, cooperative bank, small
loan company, sales finance company, investment company, or any other
financial institution that advances monies to a borrower for the purpose of
making alterations or improvements to real property.  A construction lender
does not include a person or entity who is acting in the capacity of
contractor, original contractor, or subcontractor.
(c)  "Contractor" means a person who, for compensation other than wages as an
employee, undertakes any work in a construction trade, as defined in Section
58-55-102 and includes:
(i)  any person engaged as a maintenance person who regularly engages in
activities set forth in Section 58-55-102 as a construction trade; or
(ii)  a construction manager who performs management and counseling services
on a construction project for a fee.
(d)  "Original contractor" is as provided in Section 38-1-2.
(e)  "Owner" means the person who holds any legal or equitable title or
interest in property.  Owner does not include a construction lender unless the
construction lender has an ownership interest in the property other than
solely as a construction lender.
(f)  "Public agency" means any state agency or political subdivision of the
state that enters into a construction contract for an improvement of public
property.
(g)  "Retention payment" means release of retention proceeds as defined in
Subsection (1)(h).
(h)  "Retention proceeds" means monies earned by a contractor or subcontractor
but retained by the owner or public agency pursuant to the terms of a
construction contract to guarantee payment or performance by the contractor or
subcontractor of the construction contract.
(i)  "Subcontractor" is as defined in Section 38-1-2.
(j)  "Successful party" has the same meaning as it does under Section 38-1-18.
(2) (a)  This section is applicable to all construction contracts relating to
construction work or improvements entered into on or after July 1, 1999,
between:
(i)  an owner or public agency and an original contractor;
(ii)  an original contractor and a subcontractor; and
(iii)  subcontractors under a contract described in Subsection (2)(a)(i) or
(ii).
(b)  This section does not apply to a construction lender.
(3) (a)  Notwithstanding Section 58-55-603, the retention proceeds withheld
and retained from any payment due under the terms of the construction contract
may not exceed 5% of the payment:
(i)  by the owner or public agency to the original contractor;
(ii)  by the original contractor to any subcontractor; or
(iii)  by a subcontractor.
(b)  The total retention proceeds withheld may not exceed 5% of the total
construction price.
(c) The percentage of the retention proceeds withheld and retained pursuant to
a construction contract between the original contractor and a subcontractor or
between subcontractors shall be the same retention percentage as between the
owner and the original contractor if:
(i)  the retention percentage in the original construction contract between an
owner and the original contractor is less than 5%; or
(ii)  after the original construction contract is executed but before
completion of the construction contract the retention percentage is reduced to
less than 5%.
(4) (a) If any payment on a contract with a private contractor, firm, or
corporation to do work for an owner or public agency is retained or withheld
by the owner or the public agency, as retention proceeds, it shall be placed
in an interest-bearing account.
(b)  The interest accrued under Subsection (4)(a) shall be:
(i)  for the benefit of the contractor and subcontractors; and
(ii)  paid after the project is completed and accepted by the owner or the
public agency.
(c)  The contractor shall ensure that any interest accrued on the retainage is
distributed by the contractor to subcontractors on a pro rata basis.
(5)  Any retention proceeds retained or withheld pursuant to this section and
any accrued interest shall be released pursuant to a billing statement from
the contractor within 45 days from the later of:
(a)  the date the owner or public agency receives the billing statement from
the contractor;
(b)  the date that a certificate of occupancy or final acceptance notice is
issued to:
(i)  the original contractor who obtained the building permit from the
building inspector or public agency;
(ii)  the owner or architect; or
(iii)  the public agency;
(c)  the date that a public agency or building inspector having authority to
issue its own certificate of occupancy does not issue the certificate but
permits partial or complete occupancy of a newly constructed or remodeled
building; or
(d)  the date the contractor accepts the final pay quantities.
(6)  If only partial occupancy of a building is permitted, any retention
proceeds withheld and retained pursuant to this section and any accrued
interest shall be partially released within 45 days under the same conditions
as provided in Subsection (5) in direct proportion to the value of the part of
the building occupied.
(7)  The billing statement from the contractor as provided in Subsection
(5)(a) shall include documentation of lien releases or waivers.
(8) (a)  Notwithstanding Subsection (3):
(i)  if a contractor or subcontractor is in default or breach of the terms and
conditions of the construction contract documents, plans, or specifications
governing construction of the project, the owner or public agency may withhold
from payment for as long as reasonably necessary an amount necessary to cure
the breach or default of the contractor or subcontractor; or
(ii)  if a project or a portion of the project has been substantially
completed, the owner or public agency may retain until completion up to twice
the fair market value of the work of the original contractor or of any
subcontractor that has not been completed:
(A)  in accordance with the construction contract documents, plans, and
specifications; or
(B)  in the absence of plans and specifications, to generally accepted craft
standards.
(b)  An owner or public agency that refuses payment under Subsection (8)(a)
shall describe in writing within 45 days of withholding such amounts what
portion of the work was not completed according to the standards specified in
Subsection (8)(a).
(9) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (9)(b), an original contractor or
subcontractor who receives retention proceeds shall pay each of its
subcontractors from whom retention has been withheld each subcontractor's
share of the retention received within 10 days from the day that all or any
portion of the retention proceeds is received:
(i)  by the original contractor from the owner or public agency; or
(ii)  by the subcontractor from:
(A)  the original contractor; or
(B)  a subcontractor.
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (9)(a), if a retention payment received by the
original contractor is specifically designated for a particular subcontractor,
payment of the retention shall be made to the designated subcontractor.
(10) (a)  In any action for the collection of the retained proceeds withheld
and retained in violation of this section, the successful party is entitled
to:
(i)  attorney's fees; and
(ii)  other allowable costs.
(b) (i)  Any owner, public agency, original contractor, or subcontractor who
knowingly and wrongfully withholds a retention shall be subject to a charge of
2% per month on the improperly withheld amount, in addition to any interest
otherwise due.
(ii)  The charge described in Subsection (10)(b)(i) shall be paid to the
contractor or subcontractor from whom the retention proceeds have been
wrongfully withheld.
(11) A party to a construction contract may not require any other party to
waive any provision of this section.
